Louisiana, session 2026, HB318.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Civil Code Article 185 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
Art. 185. Presumption of paternity of husband
The husband of the mother is presumed to be the father of a child born during
the marriage or within three hundred ninety days from the date of the termination of
the marriage.